Hawaii statutes.
§386-78 Compromise. (a) No compromise
in regard to a claim for compensation pending before the director shall be
valid unless it is approved by decision of the director as conforming to this
chapter and made a part of the decision.

(b) No compromise in regard to a claim for
compensation shall be effected and approved in any appeal until after the
director has been notified of the proposed terms thereof and has had an
opportunity to be heard relative thereto. [L 1963, c 116, pt of §1; Supp,
§97-77; HRS §386-78; am L 1969, c 17, §2; am L 1973, c 11, §1; am L 1982, c 59,
§1; gen ch 1985; am L 1995, c 234, §12; am L 2014, c 25, §§1, 4]

Note

The repeal and reenactment note at subsection (a) in the main
volume took effect on June 30, 2016, pursuant to L 2014, c 25, §4.

Case Notes

Where letter withdrawing compensability issue did not result
in final disposition of case, claimants properly and timely filed request for
attorney's fees and costs under provisions of administrative rule after appeals
board's final decision and order. 84 H. 390 (App.), 935 P.2d 105 (1997).

Cited: 24 H. 97, 102 (1917); 31 H. 672, 673 (1930).

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next